src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! ; general numeric expressions: 123 456,789 - note: space as thousand separator, groups of three digits
!! ; accounting numeric expressions: 123.456,789 - note: full stop as thousands separator, groups of three digits
!! ; numeric range expressions: 12-14 - can be dates, times, lengths, masses and other sorts of measurements
!! ; measurements: 123 kg
!! ; dates: 2.4.1999, 4.5., 7.8.02, 04.10.2016
!! ; times: 12:34
!! ; money amounts: kr 1234,56
!! ; temperature: –8°C, 256°K, 100°F

!! And for sure more than these. Previously everything has been more or less
!! lumped together, but to avoid noise and to get better input for grammar
!! checking the ARABICS section should be rewritten such that each category
!! gets its own lexicon. That way it is easier to restrict the syntax of
!! numerical expressions in each category.


!LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES   !!≈ !! __@CODE@__
!                       !!  This lexicon contains a number of letters and other
!                       !!  symbols found in front of digits. Their continuation
!                       !!  lexicons should probably be changed as we restructure
!                       !!  the arabic numerals.
!    §:§      ARABIC ; ! §24
!   §§:§§     ARABIC ; ! §§24
!  §% :§%     ARABIC ; ! § 24
! §§% :§§%    ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
!   %-:%-     ARABIC ; ! -24
!   %‒:%‒     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2012
!   %–:%–     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2013
!   %—:%—     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2014
!   %―:%―     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2015
!   %+:%+     ARABIC ; ! <plus>24
! %-% :%-%    ARABIC ; ! - 24
! %‒% :%‒%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
! %–% :%–%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
! %—% :%—%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
! %―% :%―%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
! %+% :%+%    ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
!   %*:%*     ARABIC ; ! *24
!   %$:%$     ARABIC ; ! $24
!   %€:%€     ARABIC ; ! €24
!   %<:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
!   %>:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
!  s%.:s%.    ARABIC ; ! s.24

LEXICON ARABICS
            +Use/Circ: ARABIC          ; ! for the arabic numerals
!                       ARABICDATE       ; ! for dates
!                       ARABICYEAR       ; ! for years
!                       ARABICCLOCK       ; ! for time
                       ARABICORD        ; ! for ordinals

LEXICON ARABIC   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ arabic numerals
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPS ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPS
 ARABICLOOP      ;
! ARABICLOOPCOLL  ;
! ARABICSabcdef ;
! ARABICLOOPORD   ; !vi begrenser til tall opp til 100
! ARABICLOOPphone ; !denne overgenerer
+Num+Card+Arab: ENDLEX ; !These numerals are not ordinals 
 
!LEXICON ARABICSabcdef
! < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > ACASETAG ;
 
 
!LEXICON ARABICDATE
!                                      ARABICDATENUM ;
!< [1|2|3|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICDATEDOT ;

!LEXICON ARABICDATEDOT
! %.%- ARABICDATENUM ;
!   %- ARABICDATENUM ;
! %.%– ARABICDATENUM ;
!   %– ARABICDATENUM ;

!LEXICON ARABICDATENUM
! < [1|2|3|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
! <     [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
! <      [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. [1] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
! <     [1|2|3] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %.   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;

!LEXICON ARABICDATENUM2
! < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag ;
!                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag ;
!                                                                                datetag ;

!LEXICON datetag
! +Num+Sem/Date: dateyearcase ;

!LEXICON ARABICCLOCK
! < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
! < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
! <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
! <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 
!LEXICON CLOCK-sep
!   %- ARABICCLOCK2 ;
!   %– ARABICCLOCK2 ;
!   numclock ;

!LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2
! < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
! < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
! <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
! <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;


!LEXICON numclock
! +Num+Sem/Time-clock: dateyearcase ; !foreløpig


!LEXICON ARABICYEAR
! < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numyear ;

!LEXICON numyear
!       yeartag  ;
! %/:%/ moreyear ;
! %-:%- moreyear ;
! %–:%– moreyear ;

!LEXICON moreyear
!                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;
! < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;


LEXICON ARABICORD
   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %0 %0 %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|2|3|6] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [4|5|7|8|9] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [2|3|6] > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|4|5|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;

   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %0 %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_FrontRound ;

   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|6] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
   < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [4|5|7|8|9] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [2|3|6] > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|4|5|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
   < [1|2|3|6] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
   < [4|5|7|8|9] %0 > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [2|3|6] > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|4|5|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;
                        < [2|3|6] > ARABICLOOPORD_Back ;
                        < [1|4|5|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOPORD_Front ;


!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphone      +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
! + ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;   ! 
!   ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;

!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneNum    +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneSep ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICCASEphone ;
!
!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneSep     +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!  (                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  )                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  —                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ; 
! %-                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ; 
! %                       ARABICLOOPphoneNum ; ! Space as separator

!LEXICON ARABICCASEphone  
! +Num+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Num+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                           ARABIC          ;
               %-:%-       ARABIC          ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
               %–:%–       ARABIC          ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers
               %—:%—       ARABIC          ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers
             %.%-:%.%-     ARABIC          ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC          ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC          ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
             %-% :%-%      ARABIC          ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
             %–% :%–%      ARABIC          ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
             %—% :%—%      ARABIC          ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
             % %-:% %-     ARABIC          ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
             % %–:% %–     ARABIC          ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
             % %—:% %—     ARABIC          ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
           % %-% :% %-%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
           % %–% :% %–%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
           % %—% :% %—%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
         % %-%-% :% %-%-%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
         % %–%–% :% %–%–%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
         % %—%—% :% %—%—%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
               %.:%.       ARABIC          ;
               %::%:       ARABIC          ;
               %,:%,       ARABIC          ;
               % :%        ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500". Lene: Denne er plagsom og bør forbedres. F.eks. 2017 30 vil vi ikke ha om ett tall.
                 :         ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
               %/:%/       ARABIC          ; ! 24/12
             %/% :%/%      ARABIC          ; ! 24/ 12
             % %/:% %/     ARABIC          ; ! 24 /12
                ':'7       ARABIC          ; ! Since ' denotes cons.grad. This is not optimal either.

!             +Num:         RNum            ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen

!          ,%-+Num:,%-      ARABICCASES     ; ! 10,-
! ,%-+Num+Err/Orth:.%-      ARABICCASES     ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
!    % %-+Err/Orth:% %-     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
!  % %-%-+Err/Orth:% %-%-   ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
!               %%:%%       ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
!             % %%:% %%     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
!                           ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_Back   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +A+Ord+Attr:%-шо # ;
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Nom#%.%<sent%>:%. # ; !for Apertium bz. 22
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERORD_Back ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_Front   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +A+Ord+Attr:%-ше # ;
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Nom#%.%<sent%>:%. # ; !for Apertium bz. 22
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERORD_Front ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_FrontRound   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +A+Ord+Attr:%-шӧ # ;
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Nom#%.%<sent%>:%. # ; !for Apertium bz. 22
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERORD_FrontRound ;

!LEXICON ACASETAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  is for 1e+Num+Sg+Num:1e
!+Num: ARABICCASES ;

!LEXICON ARABICLOOPCOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
! +N+Coll+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERCOLL ;


!LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
! +Num:            ARABICCASE0      ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
! +Num:%:          ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
! +Num+Err/Orth:   ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984s case.
! +Num+Err/Orth:'7 ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984's case.
! +Num+Err/Orth:’  ARABICCASE       ; ! optio-B07 = ’
! +Num+Err/Orth:%- ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984-s case.
! +Num+Err/Orth:´  ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984´s case.
! +Num:            ARABICCOMPOUNDS ; ! 6-jáhkasaš, 


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_Back   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Err/Orth:   ARABICCASEORD_Back ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Err/Orth:'7 ARABICCASEORD_Back ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 :%- ARABICCASEORD_Back ; ! This is the 1984-s case.

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_Front   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Err/Orth:   ARABICCASEORD_Front ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Err/Orth:'7 ARABICCASEORD_Front ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 :%- ARABICCASEORD_Front ; ! This is the 1984-s case.

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_FrontRound   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Err/Orth:   ARABICCASEORD_FrontRound ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Err/Orth:'7 ARABICCASEORD_FrontRound ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 :%- ARABICCASEORD_FrontRound ; ! This is the 1984-s case.

!LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERCOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
!          :%: ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
! +Err/Orth:   ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984s case.
! +Err/Orth:'7 ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984's case.
! +Err/Orth:%- ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984-s case.


!LEXICON MARKDOT
!    +Use/-PMatch:                     #      ;
! < "+Use/Disamb":0 "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" > NUMDOT ;

!LEXICON NUMDOT
!.+CLB:. ENDLEX;



!! The Roman numerals !
!! ------------------ !
